Connecticut, session 2026, SB00071.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a tax
credit for the amount of premiums paid to purchase an individual or
group long-term care insurance policy that provides benefits for health
care provided in an insured's home.